Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.380

Minimum licensing requirements—Window blind pull cords.

(1) Minimum licensing requirements under this chapter shall include a prohibition on the use of window blinds or other window coverings with pull cords or inner cords capable of forming a loop and posing a risk of strangulation to young children. Window blinds and other coverings that have been manufactured or properly retrofitted in a manner that eliminates the formation of loops posing a risk of strangulation are not prohibited under this section.

(2) When developing and periodically reviewing minimum licensing requirements related to safety of the premises, the secretary shall consult and give serious consideration to publications of the United States consumer product safety commission.

(3) The department may provide information as available regarding reduced cost or no-cost options for retrofitting or replacing unsafe window blinds and window coverings.

[ 2018 c 58 s 67; 2007 c 299 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.215.360.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Short title—2007 c 299: "This act may be known and cited as the Jaclyn Frank act." [ 2007 c 299 s 2.]